Massachusetts, session 194th, S2635.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including 
section 7E of chapter 90 of the General Laws, the town manager of the city known as the town of 
Barnstable may designate in writing specific town-owned vehicles authorized to mount, display 
and operate a flashing, rotating or oscillating red light in any direction, provided the red lights 
are operated solely by the town’s director of marine and environmental affairs, harbormaster and 
harbormaster staff while proceeding to an emergency or in response to an alarm in the 
performance of their official duties, and at no other time. No such red light shall be mounted or 
displayed until an application has been made to the registrar of motor vehicles and a written 
permit has been issued and delivered to the town manager. The town manager shall maintain an 
inventory of the specific vehicles, including by registration number, which are authorized to 
mount and display the red lights. 

of 2 12  SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect upon its passage.